Illinois, session 104th, SB2834.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 21-250 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/21-250)7    Sec. 21-250. Certificate of purchase. The county clerk 8shall make out and deliver to the purchaser of any property 9sold under Section 21-205, or to the county if the lien is 10acquired pursuant to Section 21-90 and a certificate is 11requested by the county or its agent, a tax certificate 12countersigned by the collector, describing the property sold, 13the date of sale, the amount of taxes, special assessments, 14interest and cost for which they were sold and that payment of 15the sale price has been made. Notwithstanding any other 16provision of law, for tax sales occurring on or after January 171, 2027, a certificate of purchase shall not be issued sooner 18than 90 days after the conclusion of the tax sale. If any 19person becomes the purchaser of more than one property owned 20by one party or person, the purchaser may have the whole or one 21or more of them included in one certificate, but separate 22certificates shall be issued in all other cases. A tax 23certificate shall be assignable by endorsement. An assignment   SB2834- 2 -LRB104 17905 HLH 31341 b1shall vest in the assignee or his or her legal 2representatives, all the right and title of the original 3purchaser.4    If the tax certificate is lost or destroyed, the county 5clerk shall issue a duplicate certificate upon written request 6and a sworn affidavit by the tax sale purchaser, or his or her 7assignee, that the tax certificate is lost or destroyed. The 8county clerk shall cause a notation to be made in the tax sale 9and judgment book that a duplicate certificate has been 10issued, and redemption payments shall be made only to the 11holder of the duplicate certificate.12(Source: P.A. 103-555, eff. 1-1-24.)